Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3638.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 241.5 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

HB3638 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

A. Beginning with the 2027 program year, the State of Oklahoma
shall participate in the federal Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer
for Children ("Summer EBT") program as authorized pursuant to the
federal Consolidated Appropriations Act of 2023, to provide
supplemental nutrition assistance to eligible children during
periods when school is not in session.
B. The Department of Human Services shall administer the Summer
EBT program and shall submit all applications, plans, and other
documentation required by the United States Department of
Agriculture or any other federal agency necessary to implement and
administer the program in accordance with federal law.
C. The Department of Human Services shall coordinate with the
State Department of Education for the purpose of determining program
eligibility and facilitating efficient program administration.
D. The Department of Human Services and the State Department of
Education are authorized to share data as necessary to implement and
administer the Summer EBT program, subject to applicable state and
federal privacy and confidentiality laws.
E. To the maximum extent permitted by federal law, benefits
issued under the Summer EBT program shall be subject to the same
eligible food restrictions applicable to the Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program in Oklahoma. The Department of Human Services
shall seek any necessary federal approvals to align program
restrictions with state policy.
HB3638 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

F. Implementation of the Summer EBT program shall be subject to
the availability of funds appropriated by the Legislature for the
purpose of administering the program. Should the federal share of
costs for administering the program be reduced from the level
approved for the 2027 program year, the State of Oklahoma shall not
be required to continue participation unless otherwise authorized by
the Legislature.
G. The Department of Human Services shall implement program
integrity measures consistent with federal requirements, including
eligibility verification, data matching, and the prevention,
detection, and recovery of improper payments.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 241.6 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Department of Human Services to be designated the "Summer
Electronic Benefit Transfer Program Revolving Fund". The fund shall
be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and
shall consist of all monies received by the Department from funding
sources, including, but not limited to, federal funds, state
appropriations, tribal government contributions, municipal or
political subdivision funds, nonprofit or charitable grants, private
or personal contributions, and other public or private sources
authorized by law. All monies accruing to the credit of said fund
HB3638 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the
Department for the purpose of funding administrative costs
associated with the Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer program.
Expenditures from said fund shall be made upon warrants issued by
the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with
the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS AND BUDGET, dated
03/05/2026 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.














HB3638 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.